Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2808.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 23, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-2324, to read: START_STATUTE13-2324. Terrorist organization designation; attorney general investigation; federal determinations; civil penalty; annual report; classification; definitions A. The attorney general may initiate an investigation into any organization within this state that is believed to be a terrorist organization and, when necessary, designate the organization as a terrorist organization. B. Before designation as a terrorist organization, the attorney general shall do all of the following: 1. Issue a draft designation notice with written justification and supporting evidence to the organization. 2. At least thirty days before the designation, publish a public notice that summarizes the basis for the proposed designation. 3. Provide the organization with an opportunity to respond in writing to the proposed designation and appear before an independent review board. C. After the review period, the attorney general may issue a final designation order that identifies the organization as a terrorist organization and the evidence relied on for the designation. D. The attorney general may use designations or findings made by the United States secretary of state pursuant to section 219(a) of the immigration and nationality act (66 stat. 163; 8 United States code section 1189(a)) as prima facie evidence when investigating and making a determination whether an organization qualifies as a terrorist organization pursuant to this section. E. On designation as a terrorist organization, an organization or an individual acting on the organization's behalf may not do any of the following: 1. Operate, maintain offices, solicit monies or recruit members within this state. 2. Request a grant, enter into a contract or lease or receive a permit from any state or local government entity. 3. Receive public monies, tax credits or subsidies. F. Each state and local government entity shall terminate any existing contract or license with a designated organization within one hundred eighty days after the designation unless a court grants a temporary exemption for good cause. G. The attorney general may impose a civil penalty up to $50,000 for a violation of subsection E, F or J of this section and recover damages to this state. H. The attorney general may initiate the seizure of any state-registered assets that belong to a designated organization after due process proceedings in the superior court. I. Beginning on January 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the attorney general shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the Senate and the speaker of the House of Representatives that identifies each designated organization, any actions taken against the organization and the justification for the designation. J. A person who knowingly aids, funds or conceals a designated organization is guilty of a class 4 felony and is subject to a civil penalty. K. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Designation as a terrorist organization" means any organization, association, nonprofit entity or coordinated network that meets one or more of the following criteria: (a) Material support for terrorist acts or ideological alignment demonstrates documented ideological, operational or advocacy alignment with any of the following: (i) A designated foreign terrorist organization. (ii) A foreign extremist movement. (iii) A transnational organization that advocates violence, intimidation or coercion to achieve political or religious objectives. (b)   Documented law enforcement or judicial identification has been: (i) Named in federal or state court proceedings. (ii) Identified in sworn testimony. (iii) Referenced in official law enforcement or prosecutorial filings as having associations with terrorist financing networks, extremist organizations or foreign ideological movements hostile to constitutional governance, whether or not criminal charges were ultimately filed against the entity. (c) Advocates parallel legal systems by promoting, endorsing or seeking the implementation of any of the following: (i) Religious law. (ii) Parallel adjudicatory systems. (iii) Advisory boards or governance mechanisms that would supersede, alter or undermine the uniform application of state or federal law. 2. "Material support" includes financial contributions, logistical services, communications, training, recruitment or coordination offered to or on behalf of a designated organization. 3. "Organization" means any corporation, association, partnership, trust or other entity, including subsidiaries and affiliates. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Severability If a provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.